District of Columbia statutes.
4-202.01a

Termination of General Public Assistance.

Effective May 1, 1997, the General Public Assistance (“GPA”) program shall be terminated. No person shall be eligible to receive GPA benefits after May 1, 1997.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 201a
as added Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 701(c), 44 DCR 7378

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-202.1a.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(c) of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 701(c) of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(c) of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary addition of section, see § 701(c) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and § 701(c) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.